Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2040.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this title which are applicable to specific provisions of this title, the following words and phrases when used in this title shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Electric scooter." As follows:(1) A device that:(i) Has two or three wheels.1234567891011121314151617181920 (ii) Has handlebars and an electric motor.(iii) Has a floorboard that the operator of the device can stand on, or a seat that the operator can sit on, while riding the device.(iv) Is powered by an electric motor.(2) The term does not include:(i) A pedalcycle with electric assist.(ii) An electric personal assistive mobility device.(iii) A motorcycle.(iv) A motorized pedalcycle.(v) A motor-driven cycle.(vi) A vehicle registered with the department.* * *Section 2. Title 75 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3725. Careless operation of electric scooters.A person who operates an electric scooter in careless disregard for the safety of another person and unintentionally causes bodily injury of another person is guilty of a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of $100.Section 3. Section 6109(a) of Title 75 is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 6109. Specific powers of department and local authorities.(a) Enumeration of police powers.--The provisions of this title shall not be deemed to prevent the department on State-designated highways and local authorities on streets or highways within their physical boundaries from the reasonable exercise of their police powers. The following are presumed to be reasonable exercises of police power:* * *20250HB2040PN2610 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (25) Establishing fines for the operation of an electric scooter on a highway, including the right-of-way, or sidewalk.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2040PN2610 - 3 - 12345